Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1148.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-45-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-45 entitled "Noise Limits
for Motor Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-45-5. Motor vehicle radios, stereos and audio systems.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any motor vehicle with a radio, stereo or audio system to produce
sound which exceeds those limits specified in this chapter. Police cars, ambulances and fire engines
shall not be subject to this section. Local cities and towns may, at their discretion, issue temporary
exemption by special permit upon a showing of good cause. Violations of this section are subject
to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
(b) Any municipality may, by ordinance, authorize a law enforcement officer, at the time
of issuing a citation for a violation of this section or a local ordinance prohibiting excessive noise,
to impound any radio, electric sound amplification device or other sound-producing device used in
the commission of the violation if the person charged with such violation is the owner of the radio,
electric sound amplification device or other sound-producing device.
(c) The ordinance shall provide for a post-impoundment hearing which shall be initiated
by a municipality attorney and held between the time of impoundment and not more than fourteen
(14) days afterwards, at which any defense may be asserted, during which time the sound-producing
device shall remain in the custody of the applicable law enforcement agency. The ordinance may
provide for impoundment of a vehicle for not more than five (5) working days pending disposition

of the violation hearing to permit the municipality or its authorized agent to remove the radio,
electric sound amplification device or other sound-producing device if the vehicle is owned by the
person charged with the violation and the sound-producing device may not be easily removed from
the vehicle at the site of the alleged violation. Upon removal of the sound-producing device, an
impounded vehicle shall be returned to its rightful owner.
(d) The ordinance promulgated pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section
may provide for recovery by the municipality of the cost of impounding the sound-producing
device and, if a vehicle is impounded, the cost of impounding the vehicle and removing the sound-
producing device. The ordinance promulgated pursuant to the provisions subsection (b) of this
section shall provide that, upon final disposition of the citation for the violation of this section or a
local ordinance prohibiting excessive noise, and payment of any fines and cost imposed, the sound-
producing device shall be returned to its rightful owner.
(e) The municipality may dispose of any impounded sound-producing device or, following
the procedure for an abandoned vehicle under §§ 31-22-14, 31-22-15, 31-22-17 and 31-22-18, any
impounded vehicle which has remained unclaimed for a period of ninety (90) days after final
disposition of the violation hearing.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003013
========
LC003013 - Page 2 of 3